pt-BR: Tecnologia de óculos 3D: Obturador ativo Bluetooth; Obturador ativo IR; Obturador ativo RF; Anáglifo magenta/verde; Anáglifo vermelho/azul; Anáglifo vermelho/ciano; Obturador ativo DLP-Link; Polarização entrelaçada; Polarização circular passiva; Polarização linear passiva; Outro
lt-LT: 3D akinių technologija: Aktyvūs užraktai Bluetooth; Aktyvūs užraktai IR; Aktyvūs užraktai RF; Anaglifinė purpurinė/žalia; Anaglifinė raudona/mėlyna; Anaglifinė raudona/žydra; DLP-Link aktyvūs užraktai; Persipynusi poliarizacija; Pasyvi žiedinė poliarizacija; Pasyvi linijinė poliarizacija; Kita
nb: 3D-briller teknologi: Aktiv lukker Bluetooth; Aktiv lukker IR; Aktiv lukker RF; Anaglyf magenta/grønn; Anaglyf rød/blå; Anaglyf rød/cyan; DLP-Link aktiv lukker; Sammenflettet polarisering; Passiv sirkulær polarisering; Passiv lineær polarisering; Annet
ko: 3D 안경 기술: 액티브 셔터 블루투스; 액티브 셔터 적외선; 액티브 셔터 무선 주파수; 애너글리프 마젠타/그린; 애너글리프 레드/블루; 애너글리프 레드/시안; DLP 링크 액티브 셔터; 인터레이스 편광; 패시브 원형 편광; 패시브 선형 편광; 기타
hr-HR: Tehnologija 3D naočala: Aktivni zatvarač Bluetooth; Aktivni zatvarač IR; Aktivni zatvarač RF; Anaglif magenta/zelena; Anaglif crvena/plava; Anaglif crvena/cijan; DLP-Link aktivni zatvarač; Isprepletana polarizacija; Pasivna kružna polarizacija; Pasivna linearna polarizacija; Ostalo
it: Tecnologia occhiali 3D: Otturatore attivo Bluetooth; Otturatore attivo IR; Otturatore attivo RF; Anaglifico magenta/verde; Anaglifico rosso/blu; Anaglifico rosso/ciano; Otturatore attivo DLP-Link; Polarizzazione interlacciata; Polarizzazione circolare passiva; Polarizzazione lineare passiva; Altro
sl-SI: Tehnologija 3D očal: Aktivna zaslonka Bluetooth; Aktivna zaslonka IR; Aktivna zaslonka RF; Anaglifna magenta/zeleno; Anaglifna rdeče/modro; Anaglifna rdeče/cijan; DLP-Link aktivna zaslonka; Prepletena polarizacija; Pasivna krožna polarizacija; Pasivna linearna polarizacija; Drugo
hu: 3D szemüveg technológiája: Aktív záras Bluetooth; Aktív záras IR; Aktív záras RF; Anaglifás magenta/zöld; Anaglifás piros/kék; Anaglifás piros/ciánkék; DLP-Link aktív záras; Váltott soros polarizáció; Passzív körkörös polarizáció; Passzív lineáris polarizáció; Egyéb
ru: Технология 3D-очков: Активные затворные Bluetooth; Активные затворные ИК; Активные затворные РЧ; Анаглифные пурпурный/зелёный; Анаглифные красный/синий; Анаглифные красный/голубой; DLP-Link активные затворные; Чересстрочная поляризация; Пассивная круговая поляризация; Пассивная линейная поляризация; Другой
vi: Công nghệ kính 3D: Màn chắn chủ động Bluetooth; Màn chắn chủ động hồng ngoại; Màn chắn chủ động RF; Anaglyph đỏ tím/xanh lá; Anaglyph đỏ/xanh dương; Anaglyph đỏ/xanh lam; Màn chắn chủ động DLP-Link; Phân cực xen kẽ; Phân cực tròn thụ động; Phân cực tuyến tính thụ động; Khác
en: 3D glasses technology: Active shutter Bluetooth; Active shutter IR; Active shutter RF; Anaglyph magenta/green; Anaglyph red/blue; Anaglyph red/cyan; DLP-Link active shutter; Interlaced polarization; Passive circular polarization; Passive linear polarization; Other
th: เทคโนโลยีแว่น 3D: แอคทีฟชัตเตอร์บลูทูธ; แอคทีฟชัตเตอร์อินฟราเรด; แอคทีฟชัตเตอร์คลื่นวิทยุ; แอนากลิฟม่วงแดง/เขียว; แอนากลิฟแดง/น้ำเงิน; แอนากลิฟแดง/ฟ้าอมเขียว; DLP-Link แอคทีฟชัตเตอร์; โพลาไรซ์แบบอินเตอร์เลซ; โพลาไรซ์วงกลมแบบพาสซีฟ; โพลาไรซ์เชิงเส้นแบบพาสซีฟ; อื่นๆ
cs: Technologie 3D brýlí: Aktivní závěrka Bluetooth; Aktivní závěrka IR; Aktivní závěrka RF; Anaglyf purpurová/zelená; Anaglyf červená/modrá; Anaglyf červená/azurová; DLP-Link aktivní závěrka; Prokládaná polarizace; Pasivní kruhová polarizace; Pasivní lineární polarizace; Jiné
pt-PT: Tecnologia de óculos 3D: Obturador ativo Bluetooth; Obturador ativo IR; Obturador ativo RF; Anáglifo magenta/verde; Anáglifo vermelho/azul; Anáglifo vermelho/ciano; Obturador ativo DLP-Link; Polarização entrelaçada; Polarização circular passiva; Polarização linear passiva; Outro
bg-BG: Технология на 3D очилата: Активни затворни Bluetooth; Активни затворни IR; Активни затворни RF; Анаглифни магента/зелен; Анаглифни червен/син; Анаглифни червен/циан; DLP-Link активни затворни; Преплетена поляризация; Пасивна кръгова поляризация; Пасивна линейна поляризация; Други
zh-TW: 3D 眼鏡技術: 主動式快門藍牙; 主動式快門紅外線; 主動式快門射頻; 紅藍立體洋紅色/綠色; 紅藍立體紅色/藍色; 紅藍立體紅色/青色; DLP-Link 主動式快門; 交錯偏光; 被動式圓偏光; 被動式線性偏光; 其他
da: 3D-brilleteknologi: Aktiv lukker Bluetooth; Aktiv lukker IR; Aktiv lukker RF; Anaglyf magenta/grøn; Anaglyf rød/blå; Anaglyf rød/cyan; DLP-Link aktiv lukker; Sammenflettet polarisering; Passiv cirkulær polarisering; Passiv lineær polarisering; Andet
sv: 3D-glasögonteknik: Aktiv slutare Bluetooth; Aktiv slutare IR; Aktiv slutare RF; Anaglyf magenta/grön; Anaglyf röd/blå; Anaglyf röd/cyan; DLP-Link aktiv slutare; Sammanflätad polarisering; Passiv cirkulär polarisering; Passiv linjär polarisering; Övrigt
pl: Technologia okularów 3D: Aktywne migawkowe Bluetooth; Aktywne migawkowe IR; Aktywne migawkowe RF; Anaglif magenta/zielony; Anaglif czerwony/niebieski; Anaglif czerwony/cyjan; DLP-Link aktywne migawkowe; Polaryzacja z przeplotem; Pasywna polaryzacja kołowa; Pasywna polaryzacja liniowa; Inne
nl: 3D-bril technologie: Actieve sluiter Bluetooth; Actieve sluiter IR; Actieve sluiter RF; Anaglyph magenta/groen; Anaglyph rood/blauw; Anaglyph rood/cyaan; DLP-Link actieve sluiter; Geïnterlinieerde polarisatie; Passieve circulaire polarisatie; Passieve lineaire polarisatie; Andere
sk-SK: Technológia 3D okuliarov: Aktívna uzávierka Bluetooth; Aktívna uzávierka IR; Aktívna uzávierka RF; Anaglyfická purpurová/zelená; Anaglyfická červená/modrá; Anaglyfická červená/azúrová; DLP-Link aktívna uzávierka; Prekladaná polarizácia; Pasívna kruhová polarizácia; Pasívna lineárna polarizácia; Iné
zh-CN: 3D 眼镜技术: 主动快门蓝牙; 主动快门红外; 主动快门射频; 色差品红色/绿色; 色差红色/蓝色; 色差红色/青色; DLP-Link 主动快门; 交错偏振; 被动圆偏振; 被动线偏振; 其他
tr: 3D gözlük teknolojisi: Aktif deklanşör Bluetooth; Aktif deklanşör IR; Aktif deklanşör RF; Anaglif macenta/yeşil; Anaglif kırmızı/mavi; Anaglif kırmızı/camgöbeği; DLP-Link aktif deklanşör; Taramalı polarizasyon; Pasif dairesel polarizasyon; Pasif doğrusal polarizasyon; Diğer
de: 3D-Brillen-Technologie: Active-Shutter Bluetooth; Active-Shutter IR; Active-Shutter RF; Anaglyphe Magenta/Grün; Anaglyphe Rot/Blau; Anaglyphe Rot/Cyan; DLP-Link Active-Shutter; Zeilensprung-Polarisation; Passive Zirkularpolarisation; Passive Linearpolarisation; Sonstiges
es: Tecnología de gafas 3D: Obturador activo Bluetooth; Obturador activo IR; Obturador activo RF; Anaglifo magenta/verde; Anaglifo rojo/azul; Anaglifo rojo/cian; Obturador activo DLP-Link; Polarización entrelazada; Polarización circular pasiva; Polarización lineal pasiva; Otros
ro-RO: Tehnologie ochelari 3D: Obturator activ Bluetooth; Obturator activ IR; Obturator activ RF; Anaglif magenta/verde; Anaglif roșu/albastru; Anaglif roșu/cyan; Obturator activ DLP-Link; Polarizare întrețesută; Polarizare circulară pasivă; Polarizare liniară pasivă; Altele
ja: 3Dメガネ技術: アクティブシャッターBluetooth; アクティブシャッターIR; アクティブシャッターRF; アナグリフマゼンタ/グリーン; アナグリフレッド/ブルー; アナグリフレッド/シアン; DLP-Linkアクティブシャッター; インターレース偏光; パッシブ円偏光; パッシブ直線偏光; その他
fr: Technologie des lunettes 3D: Obturateur actif Bluetooth; Obturateur actif IR; Obturateur actif RF; Anaglyphe magenta/vert; Anaglyphe rouge/bleu; Anaglyphe rouge/cyan; Obturateur actif DLP-Link; Polarisation entrelacée; Polarisation circulaire passive; Polarisation linéaire passive; Autre
fi: 3D-lasien tekniikka: Aktiivisulkija Bluetooth; Aktiivisulkija IR; Aktiivisulkija RF; Anaglyfi magenta/vihreä; Anaglyfi punainen/sininen; Anaglyfi punainen/syaani; DLP-Link aktiivisulkija; Lomitettu polarisaatio; Passiivinen ympyräpolarisaatio; Passiivinen lineaarinen polarisaatio; Muu
el: Τεχνολογία γυαλιών 3D: Ενεργά παραθυρόφυλλα Bluetooth; Ενεργά παραθυρόφυλλα υπερύθρων; Ενεργά παραθυρόφυλλα ραδιοσυχνότητας; Ανάγλυφα ματζέντα/πράσινο; Ανάγλυφα κόκκινο/μπλε; Ανάγλυφα κόκκινο/κυανό; DLP-Link ενεργά παραθυρόφυλλα; Πεπλεγμένη πόλωση; Παθητική κυκλική πόλωση; Παθητική γραμμική πόλωση; Άλλο